Hawaii statutes.
[§11-383] Exceptions.
Notwithstanding sections 11-381 and 11-382:

(1) A party may support more than one candidate; and

(2) A candidate for the office of governor or
lieutenant governor may support a co-candidate in the general election. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next